Utah statutes.
31A-1-108.   Corporations in the process of organizing.
Corporations in the process of organizing on July 1, 1986, may continue to
organize under former Title 31.  Any corporation so organizing that does not
obtain a certificate of authority by July 1, 1987, shall make appropriate
refunds and reimbursements to subscribers, incorporators, and creditors in
accordance with a plan approved by the commissioner.  This plan shall specify
the date that the legal existence of the corporation terminates.
